Maryland, session 2026, HB1201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–109.4.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for future major
repairs and replacement of the common elements of a condominium that:
(i) Using an itemized list, identifies each structural, mechanical,
electrical, and plumbing component of the common elements and any other components
that:
1. Are the responsibility of the council of unit owners to
repair and replace; and
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1201*

HOUSE BILL 1201
2. If applicable, meet a minimum cost of repair or
replacement, as determined by the governing body, that is:
A. Reasonably based on the expenses of the condominium;
and
B. Not a minor expense that is otherwise addressed by the
budget of the condominium;
(ii) States the normal useful life and the estimated remaining useful
life of each identified component;
(iii) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component;
(iv) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to
accomplish any identified future repair or replacement; and
(v) States the quantity or size of each identified component using the
appropriate measurement, such as unit amount, square footage, or cubic feet.
(3) “Updated reserve study” means, for the common elements since the
prior reserve study was completed within the previous 5 years, a study that:
(i) Revises replacement cost, remaining life, and useful life
estimates;
(ii) Analyzes work performed and amounts spent; and
(iii) Identifies whether any maintenance contracts are in place.
(b) (1) [This] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THIS section applies only to a residential condominium.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RESIDENTIAL
CONDOMINIUM FOR WHICH THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS VOTES TO FUND
REPAIRS TO THE COMMON ELEMENTS OF THE CONDOMINIUM THROUGH A SPECIAL
ASSESSMENT BY AN AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF THE UNIT OWNERS IN GOOD STANDING
HAVING AT LEAST 80% OF THE VOTES IN THE COUNCIL.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a condominium established in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or

HOUSE BILL 1201 3
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the condominium shall have an independent
reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the meeting of the council of
unit owners required under § 11–109(c)(16) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in
Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve study
conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a condominium established in any
county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a condominium has had a reserve study
conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an updated reserve
study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at least every 5
years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a condominium has not had a reserve
study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve study

HOUSE BILL 1201
conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every 5 years
thereafter.
(e) Each reserve study and updated reserve study required under this section
shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any unit owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the condominium in connection
with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
unit owners.
(f) (1) The governing body of a condominium shall, in consultation with a
person identified under subsection (e)(1) of this section, develop a funding plan to determine
how to fund the reserves necessary under this section.
(2) In developing the funding plan under this subsection, the governing
body shall select one of the following methods to achieve the reserve funding under this
section:
(i) The component method;
(ii) The cash flow method;
(iii) The baseline funding method;
(iv) The threshold cash flow method; or
(v) Any other funding method consistent with generally accepted
accounting principles.

HOUSE BILL 1201 5
(3) A funding plan developed under this subsection shall prioritize
adequate amounts for repair and replacement of common elements of the condominium
that are necessary for:
(i) The health, safety, and well–being of the occupants;
(ii) Ensuring structural integrity, such as roofing replacements and
maintaining structural systems;
(iii) Essential functioning, such as plumbing, sewer, heating, cooling,
and electrical infrastructure; and
(iv) Any other essential or critical purpose, as determined by the
governing body.
(4) Reserves may be used for purposes other than those specified in the
funding plan if the funds are repaid to the reserve fund within 5 years after their use.
(5) A governing body shall review progress toward compliance with the
funding plan developed under this subsection at each annual meeting of the governing
body.
11B–112.3.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Reserve study” means a study of the reserves required for future major
repairs and replacement of the common areas of a homeowners association that:
(i) Using an itemized list, identifies each structural, mechanical,
electrical, and plumbing component of the common areas and any other components that:
1. Are the responsibility of the homeowners association to
repair and replace; and
2. If applicable, meet a minimum cost of repair or
replacement, as determined by the governing body, that is:
A. Reasonably based on the expenses of the homeowners
association; and
B. Not a minor expense that is otherwise addressed by the
budget of the homeowners association;
(ii) States the estimated remaining useful life of each identified
component;

HOUSE BILL 1201
(iii) States the estimated cost of repair or replacement of each
identified component;
(iv) States the estimated annual reserve amount necessary to
accomplish any identified future repair or replacement; and
(v) States the quantity or size of each identified component using the
appropriate measurement, such as unit amount, square footage, or cubic feet.
(3) “Updated reserve study” means, for the common areas since the prior
reserve study was completed within the previous 5 years, a study that:
(i) Revises replacement cost, remaining life, and useful life
estimates;
(ii) Analyzes work performed and amounts spent; and
(iii) Identifies whether any maintenance contracts are in place.
(b) (1) This section applies only to a homeowners association:
(i) That has responsibility under its declaration for maintaining and
repairing common areas; and
(ii) For which the total repair or replacement costs for all
components identified in subsection (a) of this section is at least $10,000.
(2) This section does not apply to a homeowners association that [issues]:
(I) ISSUES bonds for the purpose of meeting capital expenditures;
(II) COMPRISES 50 OR FEWER HOMES;
(III) COMPRISES ONLY SINGLE FAMILY HOMES ON LOTS THAT
ARE UNABLE TO BE SUBDIVIDED; OR
(IV) DOES NOT HAVE RESPONSIBILITY UNDER ITS DECLARATION
FOR MAINTAINING AND REPAIRING COMMON ELEMENTS OTHER THAN COMMON
PRIVATE ROADS.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a homeowners association established
in:
(i) Prince George’s County on or after October 1, 2020;

HOUSE BILL 1201 7
(ii) Montgomery County on or after October 1, 2021; or
(iii) Any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery
County on or after October 1, 2022.
(2) The governing body of the homeowners association shall have an
independent reserve study completed not more than 90 calendar days and not less than 30
calendar days before the meeting of the homeowners association required under §
11B–106.1(a) of this title.
(3) The governing body shall have an updated reserve study completed
within 5 years after the date of the initial reserve study conducted under paragraph (2) of
this subsection and at least every 5 years thereafter.
(d) (1) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Prince George’s County before October 1, 2020.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2016, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2021, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in Montgomery County before October 1, 2021.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2017, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2022, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(3) (i) This paragraph applies only to a homeowners association
established in any county other than Prince George’s County or Montgomery County before
October 1, 2022.
(ii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have an
updated reserve study conducted within 5 years after the date of that reserve study and at

HOUSE BILL 1201
least every 5 years thereafter.
(iii) If the governing body of a homeowners association has not had a
reserve study conducted on or after October 1, 2018, the governing body shall have a reserve
study conducted on or before October 1, 2023, and an updated reserve study at least every
5 years thereafter.
(e) Each reserve study and updated reserve study required under this section
shall:
(1) Be prepared by a person who:
(i) Has prepared at least 30 reserve studies within the prior 3
calendar years;
(ii) Has participated in the preparation of at least 30 reserve studies
within the prior 3 calendar years while employed by a firm that prepares reserve studies;
(iii) Holds a current license from the State Board of Architects or the
State Board for Professional Engineers; or
(iv) Is currently designated as a reserve specialist by the Community
Association Institute or as a professional reserve analyst by the Association of Professional
Reserve Analysts;
(2) Be available for inspection and copying by any lot owner;
(3) Be reviewed by the governing body of the homeowners association in
connection with the preparation of the annual proposed budget; and
(4) Be summarized for submission with the annual proposed budget to the
lot owners.
(f) (1) The governing body of a homeowners association shall, in consultation
with a person identified under subsection (e)(1) of this section, develop a funding plan to
determine how to fund the reserves necessary under this section.
(2) In developing the funding plan under this subsection, the governing
body shall select one of the following methods to achieve the reserve funding under this
section:
(i) The component method;
(ii) The cash flow method;
(iii) The baseline funding method;

HOUSE BILL 1201 9
(iv) The threshold cash flow method; or
(v) Any other funding method consistent with generally accepted
accounting principles.
(3) A funding plan developed under this subsection shall prioritize
adequate amounts for repair and replacement of common areas of the homeowners
association that are necessary for:
(i) The health, safety, and well–being of the occupants;
(ii) Ensuring structural integrity, such as roofing replacements and
maintaining structural systems;
(iii) Essential functioning, such as plumbing, sewer, heating, cooling,
and electrical infrastructure; and
(iv) Any other essential or critical purpose, as determined by the
governing body.
(4) Reserves may be used for purposes other than those specified in the
funding plan if the funds are repaid to the reserve fund within 5 years after their use.
(5) A governing body of a homeowners association shall review progress
toward compliance with the funding plan developed under this subsection at each annual
meeting of the homeowners association.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.